California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The terms and conditions for the annexation of territory to a special district may provide, among other things, for the payment of taxes within the territory to be annexed in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this division provided for, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the special district, the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the territory proposed to be annexed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13655.

Notice fixing the time and place for hearing on the question of the annexation of territory to a special district shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13656.

The time for hearing shall be not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13657.

At or before the hearing any person interested may file with the secretary of the district written objections to the annexation of the territory to the special district or to the inclusion of his property therein. Upon the hearing, the board shall hear and determine all protests and objections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13658.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of its meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment. In the event that no protests are filed or the protests filed are overruled and denied the board shall thereupon by resolution declare the territory, or a portion thereof, annexed to the special district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13659.

From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the secretary of the district the annexation of the territory, or portion thereof, to the special district is complete.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13660.

No annexation to a special district shall operate to dissolve or terminate the legal existence of any public agency within or partly within the territory annexed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13661.

From and after the date of annexation any territory annexed to a special district is liable for payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness then existing and payable by the special district. From and after the date of annexation the board shall levy upon all of the property in the territory annexed such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of annexation, in addition to any other district taxes authorized elsewhere in this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Dissolution [13691. - 13691.]

13691.

A special district may be dissolved by resolution of the board if any proposition for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness fails to carry, and if the special district is then subject to no other indebtedness or liability pursuant to this division and has been organized for not less than two years. Such dissolution of the special district shall not prevent subsequent proceedings for the creation of a special district including the same or any part of the area of the special district dissolved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Annexation of Public Agencies [13801. - 13932.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation Agreement [13801. - 13804.]

13801.

Any public agency not included within the boundaries of a district may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this chapter or in the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of the Government Code). When proceedings for an annexation are taken pursuant to this chapter, only the provisions of this chapter shall apply to that annexation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 347, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13802.

The legislative body of the public agency proposed to be annexed shall agree in writing with the board upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement (among other things) may provide for any of the terms and conditions authorized by the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code). The corporate boundaries of the public agency to be annexed need not be coterminous with any election precincts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

13802.5.

The terms and conditions of annexation may provide, among other things, for the levy and payment of taxes within the territory to be annexed in addition to the taxes authorized elsewhere in this division, for the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, or for the making of one or more payments, or the transfer of real or personal property or other assets to the district by the public agency. Such payments may be either for the acquisition, transfer, use or right to use all or any part of the existing property of the district or for installation and construction of facilities and equipment required to serve the annexed territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 507.)
-------------------------------------------

13803.

After the legislative body of the public agency and the board have concurred upon the proposed terms and conditions, the secretary or clerk of the public agency to be annexed shall file a certified copy of the proposed agreement with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

13804.

After the filing of the proposed agreement with the executive officer, proceedings thereon shall be taken by the local agency formation commission in the manner and subject to the provisions of Part 4 (commencing at Section 56250, Government Code) of the District Reorganization Act of 1965. If the proposed annexation and agreement are approved by the commission, with or without amendment, wholly, partially or conditionally, it shall be mandatory for the board and the legislative body of the public agency to complete the proceedings for such annexation, subject to compliance with the commission’s resolution making determinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval by District [13821. - 13827.]

13821.

The agreement shall become effective and be binding upon the district and the public agency when approved in the manner set forth in this chapter.

After receipt of the resolution of the local agency formation commission making determinations, the board shall by ordinance setting forth the agreement at length declare its intention of causing it to be executed by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

13822.

The ordinance, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the first publication of the ordinance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.

At the hearing any person interested may file with the board written objections to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13824.

Upon the hearing the board shall determine whether or not the agreement will be carried into execution and shall hear and determine all objections thereto. Failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed execution of the agreement to show cause in writing pursuant to Section 13823 constitutes an assent on his part to a change in the boundaries of the district and to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.

Any hearing on the agreement may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.

If no protests are filed or if the protests filed are overruled and denied the board shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the agreement and authorize its execution, which shall become effective when executed by the public agency, duly authorized in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13827.

When executed by the district the agreement shall be dated and an executed copy filed with the secretary of the district. An executed copy shall also be filed with the secretary or clerk of the public agency to be annexed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval by Public Agency [13851. - 13856.]

13851.

At any time after the board has finally approved the agreement of annexation the legislative body of the public agency to be annexed shall cause an election to be held in the public agency to determine whether the public agency will be annexed to the district upon the terms and conditions stated in the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13852.

Notice of election shall be published as provided in Section 11534 and shall either state that a copy of the annexation agreement is on file in the office of the secretary or clerk of the public agency proposed to be annexed, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation at length, in the discretion of the legislative body calling the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

13853.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of annexation substantially as follows:Shall the ________ (public agency) be annexed to _______ municipal utility district in accordance with and subject to all of the terms and conditions of an agreement of
 annexation dated ________ now on file in the office of the clerk (or secretary) of ________ (public agency)?YESNO

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13854.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the annexation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters; except that if the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation provide for the assumption of any indebtedness of the district by any city proposed to be annexed, the proposition of annexation shall not be deemed carried unless approved by the vote of two-thirds of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13855.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body of the public agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13856.

If the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters the governing body of the public agency shall enter in its minutes an order declaring the result of the election and shall thereupon cause the agreement of annexation to be executed by its duly authorized officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Annexation [13886. - 13886.]

13886.

Upon receipt by the district of a copy of the agreement of annexation properly executed by the district and the public agency proposed to be annexed the board shall pass a resolution declaring the public agency annexed to the district. Thereupon the secretary of the district shall make the filings provided for in Chapter 8 (commencing at Section 56450, Government Code) of Part 5 of the District Reorganization Act of 1965. The annexation shall be complete and effective on the dates specified in said Chapter 8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Annexation of Territory Annexed to Public Agencies [13911. - 13912.]

13911.

Upon the completion of the annexation of any territory in accordance with law to any city included in the district the city clerk shall file with the secretary of the district a certified copy of the ordinance, resolution or other document completing said annexation, containing a description of the territory so annexed. Unless the district within 90 days after such filing shall file with the city clerk the district’s written objections to the annexation of said territory, or to a specified portion or portions thereof, to the district, said territory, or such portion or portions thereof to which the district does not object as aforesaid, shall upon the termination of said period be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district, and thereafter is subject to taxation, along with the entire territory of the district in accordance with the assessable valuation of the property thereof, for general district purposes, and for the payment of any indebtedness theretofore or thereafter incurred by the district. Any such objection filed with the city clerk by the district as to a portion or portions of said territory shall describe such portion or portions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

13912.

If the district shall file its objections in the manner aforesaid to the annexation of said territory or any specified portion or portions thereof to the district, said territory, or the portion or portions thereof so objected to, shall not be annexed to the district except in the manner provided in the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code). Prior to the expiration of the 90 day period referred to in Section 13911, the district may from time to time withdraw such objections to the annexation of said territory or any specified portion or portions thereof by filing with the city clerk a certified copy of a resolution or resolutions of the board stating that such objections to the annexation of said territory or any specified portion or portions thereof are withdrawn. Thereupon said territory, or the portion or portions as to which such objections are so withdrawn, shall be deemed incorporated into and annexed to the district as provided in Section 13911. Any such resolution or resolutions filed with the city clerk withdrawing the district’s objections to the annexation of a portion or portions of said territory shall describe such portion or portions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Annexation [13931. - 13932.]

13931.

From and after the date of annexation the board shall levy upon all of the property in the public agency annexed such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the public agency or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the annexation agreement, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13932.

No annexation of a public agency to a district shall operate to dissolve or terminate the legal existence of the public agency annexed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Annexation of Unincorporated Territory [14051. - 14052.]

14051.

Unincorporated territory may be annexed to a district in the manner provided in the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 347, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.

Unincorporated territory not contiguous to a district may not be annexed if the district does not possess facilities for supplying utility service to that territory.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Exclusion of Territory [14351. - 14384.]



  ARTICLE 1. Exclusion of Unincorporated Territory [14351. - 14351.]

14351.

Any territory contained within a district not operating any utility and not included within the boundaries of any incorporated city and not benefited in any manner by the district or by its continued inclusion therein may be excluded therefrom by proceedings under and pursuant to the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (commencing at Section 56000, Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusion of Incorporated Territory [14381. - 14384.]

14381.

If the city to which any territory included in any district has been annexed already serves electricity or water to the territory annexed, the city council or other governing body of the city may propose an agreement for the exclusion of such territory from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

14382.

The agreement for exclusion shall be authorized and executed and proceedings for such exclusion taken in the same manner as provided in Chapter 9 (commencing at Section 13801) for the annexation of a public agency to a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

14383.

If an order of exclusion is granted, the board and the governing body of the city shall by contract provide for the payment by the city of the proportion of the taxes and bonded indebtedness for which the territory excluded is justly liable. If they do not agree, either may petition the superior court in and for the county in which the property is located for a judgment declaring the proportion of the taxes and bonded indebtedness for which the territory excluded is justly liable. The proceeding shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to declaratory relief.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

14384.

The order of exclusion does not invalidate in any manner any taxes or assessments theretofore levied or assessed against the lands excluded nor relieve the property excluded from any outstanding bonds which are a lien thereon at the time of exclusion, nor from any taxes to pay the principal or interest thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.5. Hearings [14401. - 14403.5.]

14401.

Before any rates and charges for commodities or service furnished by a district are fixed or changed the general manager shall file with the board a report and recommendation thereon in writing. Within 40 days thereafter the board shall hold a public hearing on the report and recommendation. Prior to the hearing, notice of the time and place of hearing shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 294.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

A district or any interested person may bring an action pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to determine the validity of district rates or charges.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any judicial action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, or motion fixing or changing rates or charges for the commodities or service furnished by a district shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of the ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.

Before the board adopts any change in rates and charges for commodities or services furnished by an electricity district intended to increase or decrease revenues, the general manager shall file with the board a report and recommendation on the proposed changes in writing. Within 90 days, but not less than 30 days after the report is filed, except when unanticipated events cause a sudden and significant change in the electricity district’s financial condition requiring an immediate response, the board shall hold a hearing on the report and recommendation. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, except that, in the case of an unanticipated event requiring an immediate response, notice may be given pursuant to Section 6063a of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1396, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.3.

The report and recommendation of the general manager of an electricity district filed pursuant to Section 14403 shall include all of the following:

(a) The most recent annual report submitted pursuant to Section 11938.

(b) A statement of sales volumes by customer types for the preceding two years and estimates of sales volumes for the two years following.

(c) A statement of sources and disposition of funds for the preceding two years and estimates of sources and dispositions of funds for the two years following, whether or not the rate change does occur.

(d) A statement of capital expenditures anticipated during the next two years following.

(e) In sufficient detail to permit an assessment of the need for any proposed changes, a statement of each category of expense for the preceding two years, and estimates of each category of expense for the two years following.

(f) Other information as the general manager believes will explain or justify the proposed rate change.

(g) The basis for the allocation of the overall revenues among the various types of customers of the electricity district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1396, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.5.

At the hearing held pursuant to Section 14403, the board shall do both of the following:

(a) Permit any member of the public who has given 10 days advance written notice to present nonduplicative testimony on the proposed rate change or on any alternatives.

(b) Consider any report and recommendations submitted in writing by any member of the public on alternatives to the rate changes proposed by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1396, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. PUBLIC UTILITY DISTRICT ACT [15501. - 18055.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [15501. - 15533.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [15501. - 15507.]

15501.

This division may be cited as “The Public Utility District Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15503.

“District” means a public utility district formed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15504.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15505.

“Elector,” “voter,” or “qualified elector,” means a voter whose name appears on the great register of the county in which the district is located, or any supplement thereto, allowed by law to be used to determine the eligibility of persons to vote at municipal or county elections, and whose address as it appears on the great register or supplement is in the same unincorporated territory as the address given by him on the certificate or petition that is signed by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15506.

“Original and primary proposition” means the proposition to incorporate the proposed district with all of the proposed territory joining in the proceedings and mentioned and described in the several petitions presented by the electors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15507.

“Person” means an individual, a firm or a copartnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [15531. - 15533.]

15531.

The great register or supplement thereto, and certificates in due form of notaries public or verification deputies acknowledging the signature of any voter to any petition or certificate pursuant to this division, are sufficient evidence for all purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15532.

Nothing in this division shall be construed as repealing or modifying the provisions of any other law relating to public utility districts, except insofar as the provisions of such other law are inconsistent with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15533.

Whenever all the territory comprising a district becomes part of a city, the legislative body of the city succeeds to the powers of the board of directors of the district and is thereafter for all purposes the board of directors. All property, records, and documents of the district shall be transferred and conveyed by the board of directors to the legislative body of such city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Formation of Districts [15701. - 15846.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition for Formation [15701. - 15709.]

15701.

A district may be incorporated and managed in unincorporated territory pursuant to this division and may exercise the powers expressly granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15702.

Whenever the people of unincorporated territory desire to organize a district, they shall present to the board of supervisors of the county within which the territory is situated a petition describing the territory, and signed by registered voters of the territory equal in number to 15 percent of all votes cast for all candidates for Governor within the same territory at the last preceding general election at which a Governor was elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15703.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, all of which shall constitute one petition. A separate petition is required from each unit of the proposed district. All unincorporated territory participating in the proceedings and situated in one county is a unit for purposes of the proceedings. No registered voter within any one unit of the proposed district shall sign a petition of any other unit of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15704.

Each petition shall name or describe the territory within which the registered voters signing it reside. Every petition shall set forth the boundaries and name of the proposed district, which shall include the words “public utility district.” Every petition shall contain a prayer that a public utility district comprising all of the proposed territory, or any portions thereof as are designated in the petitions as essential to its formation, be incorporated pursuant to this division. Every registered voter signing a petition shall write his or her address opposite his or her signature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 266.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.

The county elections official shall within 30 days examine and verify the signatures to the petition and certify the result of the examination to the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15706.

If the county elections official, by his or her certificate, finds that a petition is insufficient, he or she shall certify to the number of additional signatures of qualified electors required to make the petition sufficient, and the petition may be amended by a supplemental petition filed within 10 days from the date of the certificate. Within 10 days after a supplemental petition has been filed, the county elections official shall examine it and certify to the result of the examination. If this certificate shows the petition as amended to be insufficient, it shall be filed by the county elections official in his or her office and kept as a public record, without prejudice to the filing of any other petition to the same effect not less than six months thereafter. If the certificate shows the petition or petition as amended to be sufficient, the county elections official shall present it to the board of supervisors without delay with his or her certificate attached and properly dated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15707.

If a supplemental petition is filed, all signatures appended to the petition and to the supplemental petition shall be considered in determining the number of qualified electors signing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15708.

After the election for the incorporation of the proposed district, the sufficiency of the petition in any respects shall not be subject to judicial review or otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15709.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, for purposes of this division all territory in the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District shall be deemed to be solely within the County of Alpine, which shall be the principal county for purposes of formation of the district and which shall have jurisdiction to approve, disapprove, and carry out all matters pertaining to formation of the district; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall limit or impair the authority of the Board of Supervisors of the County of El Dorado or the County of Amador to disapprove, by resolution, formation of all or any part of the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District within its territory any time prior to final approval of the district by the County of Alpine. If either county so disapproves, any territory designated by the resolution of disapproval shall be excluded from the boundaries of the district.

If the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District is not incorporated on or before March 1, 1986, this section is repealed on that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.   Note: This section was not repealed by its own provisions because the conditions failed.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [15731. - 15738.]

15731.

By resolution each board of supervisors to which a petition is presented shall fix a time for a hearing, which shall be within 15 days after final publication of notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15732.

Within 10 days after a petition is presented to it, the board of supervisors shall publish a copy of the petition, and a notice that the petition will be heard by the board at the time and place designated by the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15733.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time for the determination of facts, not exceeding two weeks in all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15734.

If the signatures attached to the petition are sufficient, no defect in the contents of the petition or in the title to or form of the notice shall vitiate any proceedings thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15735.

The publication of notice shall be pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation, printed, published, and circulated in the respective unit of the unincorporated territory, or if no such newspaper is printed, published, and circulated in the territory, in a newspaper printed and published elsewhere in the county and deemed most likely to give notice to the electors of the territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

15736.

At the hearing or at any time prior thereto, any owner of taxable property within the proposed district may file a petition with the board of supervisors asking that the property described in the petition be excluded from the proposed district. If the board, after hearing, finds the described property will not be substantially benefited by its inclusion in the district, it may exclude such property. At the hearing the board shall make such changes in the proposed boundaries as it deems advisable and shall define and establish the boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15737.

Any person owning land adjoining any land described in the petition, upon his verified application, in the discretion of the board, may have his land included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15738.

At the hearing the board shall determine whether or not the petition complies with the requirements set forth in this division and whether or not the notice has been published as required, and shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered in support of or in opposition to the petition. If the board determines and finds from the evidence taken at the hearing that the proposed district as its boundaries are described in the petition or as changed by the board is uneconomic or infeasible, it may dismiss the petition, but, if the board determines and finds that the petition complies with the law and that the proposed district is economic and feasible, it shall call an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not the district shall be organizaed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election [15761. - 15765.]

15761.

The special election shall be called by ordinance by each board of supervisors. The ordinance shall specify the purpose and time of the election, establish the election precincts, and designate the polling places and the names of the election officers for each precinct. The election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days after completion of publication of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

15762.

The ordinance calling the election shall be published in the unincorporated territory pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code. If no newspaper is printed, published, and circulated in the territory, publication shall be made in a newspaper printed and published elsewhere in the county and deemed most likely to give notice to the electors of the territory. The notice of election shall also be posted in at least two public places in each precinct within each unincorporated territory in which the election is held for at least 10 days prior to the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

15762.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer,
 within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed.

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

15762.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

15762.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual
 voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------
